Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5209.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18830. (1) A licensee shall not perform by any means any of the following on a cat, unless the procedure is necessary to address a therapeutic purpose: (a) An onychectomy. (b) A partial or complete phalangectomy. (c) A tendonectomy procedure. (d) Any other surgical procedure that prevents normal functioning of the claws, toes, or paws of the cat. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Cat" means a domestic cat of the species Felis catus or a hybrid of that species. Cat includes, but is not limited to, a savannah cat, Serengeti cat, Maine coon, Bengal cat, or chausie. (b) "Therapeutic purpose" means a physical medical condition of a cat, including, but not limited to, an existing or recurring illness, infection, disease, injury, or abnormal condition in the claw of a cat that compromises the cat's health. Therapeutic purpose does not include a cosmetic or aesthetic reason or a reason of convenience in keeping or handling a cat.